Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2036
Physician locum tenens; issuance authorized; conditions; term.

A physician locum tenens may be issued by the department, with the recommendation of the board, to an individual who holds an active license to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery in another state when circumstances indicate a need for the issuance of a physician locum tenens in the State of Nebraska. A physician locum tenens may be issued for a period not to exceed ninety days in any twelve-month period.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 694.